Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.900

Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Washington cosmetologists, hair designers, barbers, manicurists, and estheticians act."

[ 2015 c 62 s 12; 2002 c 111 s 17; 1984 c 208 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.